Utah statutes.
31A-23b-404.   Penalties.

(1) (a)  If, after notice and opportunity to be heard, the commissioner finds that the navigator or any other person has not materially complied with this part, or any rule made or order issued under this chapter, the commissioner may order the navigator or other person to cease doing business in the state.

(b)  If the commissioner finds that because of the material noncompliance an insurer, any policyholder of an insurer, or a recipient of a public program who used the services of the navigator or other person has suffered any loss or damage due to the material noncompliance, the commissioner may:

(i)  maintain a civil action or may intervene in an action brought by or on behalf of the insurer, policyholder, or the recipient of the public program, for recovery of compensatory damages for the benefit of the insurer, policyholder, or recipient of a public program; or

(ii)  seek other appropriate relief.

(2)  Nothing in this section affects the right of the commissioner to impose any other penalties provided for in this title.

(3)  Nothing contained in this section is intended to or shall in any manner alter or affect the rights of policyholders, claimants, creditors, or other third parties.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

